Idaho, session 2025, S1178.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Commission on Aging the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes from the
listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $11,500 $155,000 $166,500
American Rescue Plan
Fund $25,000 25,000 450,000 500,000
TOTAL $25,000 $36,500 $605,000 $666,500
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.